Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.070

Review committee—Review of plan or amendments thereto—Report.

The committee shall review the sewerage and/or water general plan or amendments thereto and shall report to the board or boards of county commissioners within ninety days their approval or any suggested amendments, deletions, or additions. If the committee shall fail to report within the time, the plan or amendments thereto shall be deemed approved. If the committee submits a report, the board shall consider and review the committee's report and may adopt any recommendations suggested therein.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 96 s 4; 1967 c 72 s 7.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1971 ex.s. c 96: See notes following RCW 36.94.010.